Idaho statutes. Title 59 PUBLIC OFFICERS IN GENERAL
Chapter 12
GROUP INSURANCE

Sec.

§ 59-1201. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 59-1202. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 59-1203. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 59-1204. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 59-1205. Position of personnel group insurance administrator created

Appointment. [Repealed.]

§ 59-1206. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 59-1207. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 59-1208. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 59-1209. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 59-1210. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 59-1211. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 59-1212. Existing group policies, contracts unaffected. [Repealed.]

§ 59-1213. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 59-1214. [Amended and Redesignated.]